Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Contested Cases

4-5-301. Conduct of contested cases.

In the hearing of any contested case, the proceedings or any part thereof shall be conducted:

In the presence of the requisite number of members of the agency as prescribed by law and in the presence of an administrative judge or hearing officer; or

By an administrative judge or hearing officer sitting alone.

It is the duty of the administrative judge or hearing officer to preside at the hearing, rule on questions of the admissibility of evidence, swear witnesses, advise the agency members as to the law of the case, and ensure that the proceedings are carried out in accordance with this chapter, other applicable law and the rules of the respective agency. At no time shall the administrative judge or hearing officer hearing a case with agency members under subsection (a) take part in the determination of a question of fact, unless the administrative judge or hearing officer is an agency member. An administrative judge or hearing officer shall, upon the judge's or the officer's own motion, or timely motion of a party, decide any procedural question of law.

The agency shall determine whether a contested case shall be conducted by an administrative judge or hearing officer sitting alone or in the presence of members of the agency; provided, that administrative judges or hearing officers employed in the office of the secretary of state shall not be required to conduct a contested case sitting alone in the absence of agreement between the agency and the secretary of state.

Contested cases under this section may be conducted by administrative judges or hearing officers employed in the office of the secretary of state upon the request of the agency being presented to the secretary of state and the request being granted.

Any agency not authorized by law to have a contested case conducted by an administrative judge, hearing officer or similar officer from the agency shall direct that the proceedings or any part thereof be conducted by an administrative judge or hearing officer employed in the office of the secretary of state.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 37; 1984, ch. 728, § 11.

Cross-References. Number of agency members required to hear contested case, §4-5-107.

Law Reviews.

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

How Many Bites Are Enough? The Supreme Court's Decision in University of Tennessee v. Elliott (Robert P. Morris), 55 Tenn. L. Rev. 205 (1988).

Nonacquiescence: Outlaw Agencies, Imperial Courts, and the Perils of Pluralism (Deborah Maranville), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 471 (1986).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. To the extent that it conflicts with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (UAPA), T.C.A. §67-1-105(d) is superseded by the UAPA, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).

If a contested case is heard by an administrative judge or hearing officer appointed by the commissioner of revenue under the authority of T.C.A. §67-1-105(b)(2), the conduct of the contested case is governed by the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act applicable to proceedings conducted by an administrative judge or hearing officer sitting alone; in those cases, the hearing officer is required to issue an initial order, which is reviewable by the commissioner, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).

T.C.A. §§4-5-301(a)(1) and4-5-314(a) do not apply when the commissioner elects to appoint an administrative judge or hearing officer to hold a contested case hearing sitting alone and in the absence of the commissioner, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).

The HUD regulations do not preempt the Administrative Procedures Act under any of the theories of implied preemption. OAG 10-105, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 111 (10/15/10).

The Tennessee Uniform Administrative Procedures Act (“UAPA”) does not violate the Due Process Clause. Neither Title IX of the Education Amendments of 1972 nor the Jeanne Clery Disclosure of Campus Security and Campus Crime Statistics Act (“Clery Act”) preempts the UAPA contested-case provisions applicable to the adjudication of sexual assault claims involving students at Tennessee public institutions of higher education. Disciplinary proceedings in a school sexual assault case must be completed “promptly,” but neither the Due Process Clause, nor Title IX, nor the Clery Act imposes any specified or fixed time limit for the completion of a UAPA contested-case proceeding in sexual assault cases. The Due Process Clause, Title IX, and the Clery Act all require that an accuser be allowed to participate in a hearing, and the UAPA gives all parties the right to participate in a contested case hearing. To comply with the requirements of Title IX, schools must independently investigate and adjudicate allegations of student-on-student sexual harassment and assault. Title IX would likely preempt a state law requiring public institutions to refer sexual assault or similar allegations to law enforcement before suspending or expelling a student. There is currently no federally codified evidentiary standard applicable to such disciplinary proceedings. However, guidance issued by the Department of Education interpreting Title IX regulations states that schools should apply a preponderance-of-evidence standard in disciplinary proceedings related to claims of sexual assault. OAG 17-03, 2017 Tenn. AG LEXIS 3 (1/17/2017).

4-5-302. Disqualification of judge, hearing officer, etc. — Substitutions.

Any administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member shall be subject to disqualification for bias, prejudice, interest or any other cause provided in this chapter or for any cause for which a judge may be disqualified.

Any party may petition for the disqualification of an administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member promptly after receipt of notice indicating that the individual will serve or, if later, promptly upon discovering facts establishing grounds for disqualification.

A party petitioning for the disqualification of an agency member shall not be allowed to question the agency member concerning the grounds for disqualification at the hearing or by deposition unless ordered by the administrative judge or hearing officer conducting the hearing and agreed to by the agency member.

The individual whose disqualification is requested shall determine whether to grant the petition, stating facts and reasons for the determination.

If a substitute is required for an individual who becomes unavailable as a result of disqualification or any other reason, the substitute shall be appointed, unless otherwise provided by law by:

The governor, if the unavailable individual is a cabinet member or elected official, except that the speakers of the senate and house of representatives shall appoint a substitute for individuals elected by the general assembly; or

The appointing authority, if the unavailable individual is an appointed official.

Any action taken by a duly appointed substitute for an unavailable individual shall be as effective as if taken by the unavailable individual.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 38.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-303. Separation of functions.

A person who has served as an investigator, prosecutor or advocate in a contested case may not serve as an administrative judge or hearing officer or assist or advise an administrative judge or hearing officer in the same proceeding.

A person who is subject to the authority, direction or discretion of one who has served as investigator, prosecutor or advocate in a contested case may not serve as an administrative judge or hearing officer or assist or advise an administrative judge or hearing officer in the same proceeding.

A person who has participated in a determination of probable cause or other equivalent preliminary determination in a contested case may not serve as an administrative judge or hearing officer or assist or advise an administrative judge or hearing officer in the same proceeding.

A person may serve as an administrative judge or hearing officer at successive stages of the same contested case, unless a party demonstrates grounds for disqualification in accordance with § 4-5-302.

A person who has participated in a determination of probable cause or other equivalent preliminary determination or participated in or made a decision that is on administrative appeal in a contested case may serve as an agency member in the contested case where authorized by law and not subject to disqualification or other cause provided in this chapter.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 39.

Law Reviews.

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-304. Ex parte communications.

Unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by statute, an administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member serving in a contested case proceeding may not communicate, directly or indirectly, regarding any issue in the proceeding, while the proceeding is pending, with any person without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication.

Notwithstanding subsection (a), an administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member may communicate with agency members regarding a matter pending before the agency or may receive aid from staff assistants, members of the staff of the attorney general and reporter, or a licensed attorney, if such persons do not receive ex parte communications of a type that the administrative judge, hearing officer or agency members would be prohibited from receiving, and do not furnish, augment, diminish or modify the evidence in the record.

Unless required for the disposition of ex parte matters specifically authorized by statute, no party to a contested case, and no other person may communicate, directly or indirectly, in connection with any issue in that proceeding, while the proceeding is pending, with any person serving as an administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member without notice and opportunity for all parties to participate in the communication.

If, before serving as an administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member in a contested case, a person receives an ex parte communication of a type that may not properly be received while serving, the person, promptly after starting to serve, shall disclose the communication in the manner prescribed in subsection (e).

An administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member who receives an ex parte communication in violation of this section shall place on the record of the pending matter all written communications received, all written responses to the communications, and a memorandum stating the substance of all oral communications received, all responses made, and the identity of each person from whom the person received an ex parte communication, and shall advise all parties that these matters have been placed on the record. Any party desiring to rebut the ex parte communication shall be allowed to do so, upon requesting the opportunity for rebuttal within ten (10) days after notice of the communication.

An administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member who receives an ex parte communication in violation of this section may be disqualified if necessary to eliminate the effect of the communication.

The agency shall, and any party may, report any willful violation of this section to appropriate authorities for any disciplinary proceedings provided by law. In addition, each agency by rule may provide for appropriate sanctions, including default, for any violations of this section.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 41.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-305. Representation.

Any party may participate in the hearing in person or, if the party is a corporation or other artificial person, by a duly authorized representative.

Whether or not participating in person, any party may be advised and represented at the party's own expense by counsel or, unless prohibited by law, other representative.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 43.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

The Proper Scope of Nonlawyer Representation in State Administrative Proceedings: A State Specific Balancing Approach, 43 Vand. L. Rev. 245 (1990).

Attorney General Opinions. Even though Administrative Law Judges have already limited nonlawyer corporate representatives to giving an oral statement on the record, the nonlawyer representative of a corporation should exercise caution when providing an oral statement as this practice would appear to present the potential for the unauthorized practice of law that could only be resolved on a case-by-case basis, OAG 04-160, 2004 Tenn. AG LEXIS 172 (11/10/04).

4-5-306. Prehearing conferences.

In any action set for hearing, the administrative judge or hearing officer assigned to hear the case, upon the administrative judge's or the hearing officer's own motion, or upon motion of one (1) of the parties or such party's qualified representatives, may direct the parties or the attorneys for the parties, or both, to appear before the administrative judge or hearing officer for a conference to consider:

The simplification of issues;

The necessity or desirability of amendments to the pleadings;

The possibility of obtaining admissions of fact and of documents that will avoid unnecessary proof;

The limitation of the number of expert witnesses; and

Such other matters as may aid in the disposition of the action.

The administrative judge or hearing officer shall make an order that recites the action taken at the conference, the amendments allowed to the pleadings, and the agreements made by the parties as to any of the matters considered, and that limits the issues for hearing to those not disposed of by admissions or agreements of the parties, and such order when entered controls the subsequent course of the action, unless modified at the hearing to prevent manifest injustice.

Upon reasonable notice to all parties, the administrative judge or hearing officer may convene a hearing or convert a prehearing conference to a hearing, to be conducted by the administrative judge or hearing officer sitting alone, to consider argument or evidence, or both, on any question of law. The administrative judge or hearing officer may render an initial order, as otherwise provided by this chapter, on the question of law.

In the discretion of the administrative judge or hearing officer, all or part of the prehearing conference may be conducted by telephone, television or other electronic means, if each participant in the conference has an opportunity to participate in, to hear, and, if technically feasible, to see the entire proceeding while it is taking place.

If a prehearing conference is not held, the administrative judge or hearing officer for the hearing may issue a prehearing order, based on the pleadings, to regulate the conduct of the proceedings.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 8; 1975, ch. 370, §§ 3, 12; 1978, ch. 938, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 4-514, 4-5-108(d); Acts 1982, ch. 874, §§ 44, 54.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-307. Notice of hearing.

In a contested case, all parties shall be afforded an opportunity for hearing after reasonable notice.

In all proceedings the notice shall include:

A statement of the time, place, nature of the hearing, and the right to be represented by counsel;

A statement of the legal authority and jurisdiction under which the hearing is to be held, including a reference to the particular sections of the statutes and rules involved; and

A short and plain statement of the matters asserted. If the agency or other party is unable to state the matters in detail at the time the notice is served, the initial notice may be limited to a statement of the issues involved. Thereafter, upon timely, written application a more definite and detailed statement shall be furnished ten (10) days prior to the time set for the hearing.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 8; 1975, ch. 370, §§ 3, 12; 1978, ch. 938, §§ 4, 5; T.C.A., §§ 4-514, 4-5-108(a), (b); Acts 1982, ch. 874, §§ 45, 54.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-308. Filing pleadings, briefs, motions, etc. — Service.

The administrative judge or hearing officer, at appropriate stages of the proceedings, shall give all parties full opportunity to file pleadings, motions, objections and offers of settlement.

The administrative judge or hearing officer, at appropriate stages of the proceedings, may give all parties full opportunity to file briefs, proposed findings of fact and conclusions of law, and proposed initial or final orders.

A party shall serve copies of any filed item on all parties, by mail or any other means prescribed by agency rule.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 46.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-309. Default.

If a party fails to attend or participate in a prehearing conference, hearing or other stage of a contested case, the administrative judge or hearing officer, hearing the case alone, or agency, sitting with the administrative judge or hearing officer, may hold the party in default and either adjourn the proceedings or conduct them without the participation of that party, having due regard for the interest of justice and the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceedings.

If the proceedings are conducted without the participation of the party in default, the administrative judge or hearing officer, hearing the case alone, shall include in the initial order a written notice of default, otherwise, the agency, sitting with the administrative judge or hearing officer, shall include such written notice of default in the final order. If the proceedings are adjourned and not conducted, the administrative judge or hearing officer, hearing the case alone, may render an initial default order, otherwise, the agency, sitting with the administrative judge or hearing officer, may render a final default order. All default orders and notices of default in default orders shall include a written statement of the grounds for the default.

A party may petition to have a default set aside by filing a timely petition for reconsideration as provided in § 4-5-317.

If a party fails to file a timely petition for reconsideration or the petition is not granted, the administrative judge or hearing officer, sitting alone, or agency, sitting with the administrative judge or hearing officer, shall conduct any further proceedings necessary to complete the contested case without the participation of the defaulting party and shall determine all issues in the adjudication, including those affecting the defaulting party.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 47.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-310. Intervention.

The administrative judge or hearing officer shall grant one (1) or more petitions for intervention if:

The petition is submitted in writing to the administrative judge or hearing officer, with copies mailed to all parties named in the notice of the hearing, at least seven (7) days before the hearing;

The petition states facts demonstrating that the petitioner's legal rights, duties, privileges, immunities or other legal interest may be determined in the proceeding or that the petitioner qualifies as an intervenor under any law; and

The administrative judge or hearing officer determines that the interests of justice and the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceedings shall not be impaired by allowing the intervention.

The agency may grant one (1) or more petitions for intervention at any time, upon determining that the intervention sought is in the interests of justice and shall not impair the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceedings.

If a petitioner qualifies for intervention, the administrative judge or hearing officer may impose conditions upon the intervenor's participation in the proceedings, either at the time that intervention is granted or at any subsequent time. Conditions may include:

Limiting the intervenor's participation to designated issues in which the intervenor has a particular interest demonstrated by the petition;

Limiting the intervenor's use of discovery, cross-examination and other procedures so as to promote the orderly and prompt conduct of the proceedings; and

Requiring two (2) or more intervenors to combine their presentations of evidence and argument, cross-examination, discovery and other participation in the proceedings.

The administrative judge, hearing officer or agency, at least twenty-four (24) hours before the hearing, shall render an order granting or denying each pending petition for intervention, specifying any conditions, and briefly stating the reasons for the order. The administrative judge, hearing officer or agency may modify the order at any time, stating the reasons for the modification. The administrative judge, hearing officer or agency shall promptly give notice of an order granting, denying or modifying intervention to the petitioner for intervention and to all parties.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 48.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Regulatory board's authority to approve settlement in absence of intervenor approval. OAG 11-6, 2011 Tenn. AG LEXIS 6 (1/11/11).

4-5-311. Discovery — Subpoenas — Protective orders.

The administrative judge or hearing officer, at the request of any party, shall issue subpoenas, effect discovery, and issue protective orders, in accordance with the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure, except that service in contested cases may be by certified mail in addition to means of service provided by the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. The administrative judge or hearing officer shall decide any objection relating to discovery under this chapter or the Tennessee Rules of Civil Procedure. Witnesses under subpoena shall be entitled to the same fees as are now or may hereafter be provided for witnesses in civil actions in the circuit court and, unless otherwise provided by law or by action of the agency, the party requesting the subpoenas shall bear the cost of paying fees to the witnesses subpoenaed.

In case of disobedience to any subpoena issued and served under this section or to any lawful agency requirement for information, or of the refusal of any person to testify in any matter regarding which such person may be interrogated lawfully in a proceeding before an agency, the agency may apply to the circuit or chancery court of the county of such person's residence, or to any judge or chancellor thereof, for an order to compel compliance with the subpoena or the furnishing of information or the giving of testimony. Forthwith, the court shall cite the respondent to appear and shall hear the matter as expeditiously as possible. If the disobedience or refusal is found to be unlawful, the court shall enter an order requiring compliance. Disobedience of such order shall be punished as contempt of court in the same manner and by the same procedure as is provided for like conduct committed in the course of judicial proceedings.

The agency may promulgate rules to further prevent abuse and oppression in discovery.

Any party to a contested case shall have the right to inspect the files of the agency with respect to the matter and to copy therefrom, except that records, the confidentiality of which is protected by law, may not be inspected.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, §§ 10, 11; 1975, ch. 370, § 4; 1978, ch. 938, §§ 9, 10, 11; T.C.A., §§ 4-516, 4-517, 4-5-110(b), 4-5-111(c); Acts 1982, ch. 874, §§ 49, 50.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1- 3-111.

Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 23.10.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-312. Procedure at hearing.

The administrative judge or hearing officer shall regulate the course of the proceedings, in conformity with the prehearing order if any.

To the extent necessary for full disclosure of all relevant facts and issues, the administrative judge or hearing officer shall afford to all parties the opportunity to respond, present evidence and argument, conduct cross-examination, and submit rebuttal evidence, except as restricted by a limited grant of intervention or by the prehearing order.

In the discretion of the administrative judge or hearing officer and agency members and by agreement of the parties, all or part of the hearing may be conducted by telephone, television or other electronic means, if each participant in the hearing has an opportunity to participate in, to hear, and, if technically feasible, to see the entire proceedings while taking place.

The hearing shall be open to public observation pursuant to title 8, chapter 44, unless otherwise provided by state or federal law. To the extent that a hearing is conducted by telephone, television or other electronic means, the availability of public observation shall be satisfied by giving members of the public an opportunity, at reasonable times, to hear the tape recording and to inspect any transcript obtained by the agency, except as otherwise provided by § 50-7-701.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 51.

Law Reviews.

Bid Protests in Tennessee (Steven W. Feldman), 34 No. 5 Tenn. B.J. 27 (1998).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

4-5-313. Rules of evidence — Affidavits — Official notice.

In contested cases:

The agency shall admit and give probative effect to evidence admissible in a court, and when necessary to ascertain facts not reasonably susceptible to proof under the rules of court, evidence not admissible thereunder may be admitted if it is of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent men in the conduct of their affairs. The agency shall give effect to the rules of privilege recognized by law and to agency statutes protecting the confidentiality of certain records, and shall exclude evidence which in its judgment is irrelevant, immaterial or unduly repetitious;

At any time not less than ten (10) days prior to a hearing or a continued hearing, any party shall deliver to the opposing party a copy of any affidavit such party proposes to introduce in evidence, together with a notice in the form provided in subdivision (4). Unless the opposing party, within seven (7) days after delivery, delivers to the proponent a request to cross-examine an affiant, the opposing party's right to cross-examination of such affiant is waived and the affidavit, if introduced in evidence, shall be given the same effect as if the affiant had testified orally. If an opportunity to cross-examine an affiant is not afforded after a proper request is made as provided in this subdivision (2), the affidavit shall not be admitted into evidence. “Delivery” for purposes of this section means actual receipt;

The officer assigned to conduct the hearing may admit affidavits not submitted in accordance with this section where necessary to prevent injustice;

The notice referred to in subdivision (2) shall contain the following information and be substantially in the following form:

The accompanying affidavit of (here insert name of affiant) will be introduced as evidence at the hearing in (here insert title of proceeding) . (Here insert name of affiant) will not be called to testify orally and you will not be entitled to question such affiant unless you notify at (here insert name of proponent or proponent's attorney) (here insert address) that you wish to cross-examine such affiant. To be effective, your request must be mailed or delivered to (here insert name of proponent or the proponent's attorney) on or before (here insert a date seven (7) days after the date of mailing or delivering the affidavit to the opposing party.);

Click to view form.

Documentary evidence otherwise admissible may be received in the form of copies or excerpts, or by incorporation by reference to material already on file with the agency. Upon request, parties shall be given an opportunity to compare the copy with the original, if reasonably available; and

Official notice may be taken of:

Any fact that could be judicially noticed in the courts of this state;

The record of other proceedings before the agency;

Technical or scientific matters within the agency's specialized knowledge; and

Codes or standards that have been adopted by an agency of the United States, of this state or of another state, or by a nationally recognized organization or association;

Parties must be notified before or during the hearing, or before the issuance of any initial or final order that is based in whole or in part on facts or material noticed, of the specific facts or material noticed and the source thereof, including any staff memoranda and data, and be afforded an opportunity to contest and rebut the facts or material so noticed.

Acts 1974, ch. 725, § 9; 1978, ch. 938, §§ 6-8; T.C.A., §§ 4-515, 4-5-109; Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 52.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, §10-7-504.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rule 101 of the Tennessee Rules of Evidence.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), Rule 101, § 802.2.

Law Reviews.

Forfeitures Under the Tennessee Drug Control Act (Lewis L. Laska), 16 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 431 (1986).

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. Confidentiality of audit information obtained by the ethics commission. OAG 13-88, 2013 Tenn. AG LEXIS 87 (11/6/13).

4-5-314. Final order — Initial order.

An agency with statutory authority to decide a contested case shall render a final order.

If an administrative judge or hearing officer hears a case alone under § 4-5-301(a)(2), the administrative judge or hearing officer shall render an initial order, which shall become a final order unless reviewed in accordance with § 4-5-315.

A final order, initial order or decision under § 50-7-304 shall include conclusions of law, the policy reasons therefor, and findings of fact for all aspects of the order, including the remedy prescribed and, if applicable, the action taken on a petition for stay of effectiveness. Findings of fact, if set forth in language that is no more than mere repetition or paraphrase of the relevant provision of law, shall be accompanied by a concise and explicit statement of the underlying facts of record to support the findings. The final order, initial order or decision must also include a statement of the available procedures and time limits for seeking reconsideration or other administrative relief and the time limits for seeking judicial review of the final order. An initial order or decision shall include a statement of any circumstances under which the initial order or decision may, without further notice, become a final order.

Findings of fact shall be based exclusively upon the evidence of record in the adjudicative proceeding and on matters officially noticed in that proceeding. The agency member's experience, technical competence and specialized knowledge may be utilized in the evaluation of evidence.

If an individual serving or designated to serve as an administrative judge, hearing officer or agency member becomes unavailable, for any reason, before rendition of the final order or initial order or decision, a substitute shall be appointed as provided in § 4-5-302. The substitute shall use any existing record and may conduct any further proceedings as is appropriate in the interest of justice.

The administrative judge or hearing officer may allow the parties a designated amount of time after conclusion of the hearing for the submission of proposed findings.

A final order rendered pursuant to subsection (a) or initial order rendered pursuant to subsection (b) shall be rendered in writing within ninety (90) days after conclusion of the hearing or after submission of proposed findings in accordance with subsection (f) unless such period is waived or extended with the written consent of all parties or for good cause shown.

The agency shall cause copies of the final order under subsection (a) and the administrative judge or hearing officer shall cause copies of the initial order under subsection (b) to be delivered to each party.

Acts 1982, ch. 874, § 54.

Law Reviews.

Symposium – Memphis in The Law: The Process of Determining What Process is Due: The Continuing Saga of Memphis Light, Gas & Water Division v. Craft, 436 U.S. 1 (1978) (Donna Harkness), 41 U. Mem. L. Rev. 745 (2011).

Attorney General Opinions. If a contested case is heard by an administrative judge or hearing officer appointed by the commissioner of revenue under the authority of T.C.A. §67-1-105(b)(2), the conduct of the contested case is governed by the provisions of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act applicable to proceedings conducted by an administrative judge or hearing officer sitting alone; in those cases, the hearing officer is required to issue an initial order, which is reviewable by the commissioner, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).

T.C.A. §§4-5-301(a)(1) and4-5-314(a) do not apply when the commissioner elects to appoint an administrative judge or hearing officer to hold a contested case hearing sitting alone and in the absence of the commissioner, OAG 02-071, 2002 Tenn. AG LEXIS 76 (5/29/02).